Utah statutes.
22-7-106.   Settlor created unitrust.

A settlor may create a trust instrument with terms providing that the trust shall be administered as a total return unitrust under this chapter.  A settlor may also create a trust instrument with terms providing that the trust may be administered as either an income trust or as a total return unitrust under this chapter in the discretion of the trustee or a trust protector appointed in the trust instrument.



Enacted by Chapter 244, 2013 General Session

